Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-523
Audiology or speech-language assistant; duties and activities.

An audiology or speech-language pathology assistant may, under the supervision of a licensed audiologist or speech-language pathologist, perform the following duties and activities:

(1) Implement programs and procedures designed by a licensed audiologist or speech-language pathologist;

(2) Maintain records of implemented procedures which document a patient's responses to treatment;

(3) Provide input for interdisciplinary treatment planning, inservice training, and other activities directed by a licensed audiologist or speech-language pathologist;

(4) Prepare instructional material to facilitate program implementation as directed by a licensed audiologist or speech-language pathologist;

(5) Follow plans, developed by the licensed audiologist or speech-language pathologist, that provide specific sequences of treatment to individuals with communicative disorders or dysphagia; and

(6) Chart or log patient responses to the treatment plan.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 28;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 74;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.06;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 208.